Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF831.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 5 TLSB 1298HV (2) 91 as/js H.F. 831 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 13.36 Human trafficking prosecution 1 units. 2 1. Two human trafficking prosecution units are established 3 in the department of justice. The attorney general, in 4 cooperation and coordination with the department of public 5 safety, the office to combat human trafficking established 6 within the department of public safety under section 80.45, and 7 the department of health and human services, shall develop, 8 staff, and equip two multidisciplinary teams to identify, 9 investigate, and prosecute human trafficking cases and provide 10 care and support for the victims of human trafficking. 11 2. One human trafficking prosecution unit shall serve the 12 western half of the state, and the other human trafficking 13 prosecution unit shall serve the eastern half of the state, 14 with interstate 35 serving as the bisecting line. 15 3. A human trafficking prosecution unit shall include but 16 not be limited to: 17 a. The attorney general, or the attorney generalâs designee. 18 b. Criminal investigators from the department of public 19 safety. 20 c. State and local law enforcement representatives. 21 d. Victim services representatives. 22 e. Health care representatives. 23 f. Community organization representatives. 24 g. Survivor advocacy group representatives. 25 4. In addition to the duties set forth in subsection 26 1, a human trafficking prosecution unit may also conduct 27 training and provide technical assistance to increase community 28 awareness. 29 5. For purposes of this section, âhuman traffickingâ means 30 the same as defined in section 710A.1. 31 Sec. 2. NEW SECTION . 533C.1004 Wire transmission fees. 32 1. For purposes of this section, âwire transmissionâ means 33 money transmission by wire including transmission within this 34 country or to or from locations abroad. 35 -1- LSB 1298HV (2) 91 as/js 1/ 4 H.F. 831 2. In addition to any other fee required by law for a wire 1 transmission, a licensee or the licenseeâs authorized delegate 2 shall collect from a customer a fee of five dollars for each 3 wire transmission equal to or less than five hundred dollars, 4 and in addition to such fee, if applicable, an amount equal to 5 two percent of the amount of the wire transmission in excess 6 of five hundred dollars. 7 3. The fees collected under subsection 2 shall be remitted 8 quarterly by the licensee or the licenseeâs authorized 9 delegate to the department of revenue in the form and manner 10 prescribed by the department of revenue, in consultation with 11 the department of public safety. All required forms and 12 remittances shall be filed with the department of revenue no 13 later than the fifteenth day of the month following the close 14 of each calendar quarter. 15 4. The department of revenue shall account for all fees 16 remitted under subsection 3 and pay over the same to the office 17 to combat human trafficking established in section 80.45. 18 5. A licensee and the authorized delegate of a licensee 19 furnishing money transfer services shall post a notice, in the 20 form and manner prescribed by the department of public safety, 21 that notifies customers that upon filing an individual income 22 tax return with a valid social security number or a valid 23 taxpayer identification number, the customer shall be entitled 24 to an individual income tax credit equal to the amount of wire 25 transmission fees paid by the customer during the tax year. 26 6. a. The department of revenue, in consultation with the 27 department of public safety, shall enforce the provisions of 28 this section. 29 b. If a licensee or licenseeâs authorized delegate fails 30 to comply with subsection 3, the department of revenue shall 31 notify the superintendent who may suspend or revoke the 32 licenseeâs license under section 533C.901, and may issue an 33 order suspending or revoking the designation of an authorized 34 delegate under section 533C.902. Notification of a suspension 35 -2- LSB 1298HV (2) 91 as/js 2/ 4 H.F. 831 under this paragraph shall be delivered to the commissioner of 1 public safety. 2 c. Upon request by the department of revenue, the 3 superintendent may file a claim against the surety bond of the 4 licensee on behalf of the state. 5